South Dakota, session 2026, HB1306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 13:
Terms used in this chapter mean:
(1) "Eligible student," a student who has not reached the age of nineteen prior to July
first of the current school year and:
(a) Is in any educational grade level from kindergarten through twelve;
(b) Is a resident of this state;
(c) Is a United States citizen or an alien who has permanent resident status;
and
(d) Is a member of a household whose annual income during the preceding
calendar year did not exceed three hundred percent of the area median
income, as determined by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban
Development; and
(e) Is not enrolled full-time in a school district in this state;
(2) "Microschool," a business entity that:
(a) Is registered with the secretary of state;
(b) Is located within this state;
(c) Provides educational services or academic opportunities to students who
receive alternative instruction in accordance with chapter 13-27; and
(d) Requires enrollment and the payment of tuition;
(3) "Parent," any guardian, custodian, or other person with authority to act in place of
a parent for the child;
(4) "Scholarship," a grant to an eligible student to support the student's education;
and
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1306B 2 1306
(5) "Scholarship granting organization," an entity that is registered in accordance with
section 3 of this Act.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 13:
Any person may provide a charitable contribution to a scholarship granting
organization that is registered with the Department of Education, in accordance with
section 3 of this Act.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 13:
In order to become registered, a scholarship granting organization must:
(1) File with the Department of Education documentation indicating that the
organization is exempt from federal taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501 (January 1,
2026); and
(2) Enter into a contract with the department to:
(a) Distribute scholarships to or on behalf of eligible students in accordance
with this chapter and rules adopted by the department;
(b) Retain no more than ten percent of the total annual contributions received
under this chapter for administrative expenses;
(c) Provide an annual statement to each contributor verifying the amount
contributed; and
(d) Provide to the department, no later than June first of each year, an audited
financial statement showing, for the preceding calendar year, the amount
of contributions received, the number and amount of scholarships awarded
to or on behalf of eligible students, and the purposes for which the
scholarship dollars were used.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 13:
The parent of an eligible student may annually apply to the scholarship granting
organization for a scholarship.
A scholarship awarded to or on behalf of an eligible student must be forwarded to
the student's parent and used for:
(1) Tuition and fees required as a condition of enrollment in a school district or at an
accredited nonpublic school or microschool located within this state;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1306B 3 1306
(2) Virtual coursework approved by the Department of Education and offered by a
provider, but not on behalf of a school district;
(3) The purchase of curricula and associated instructional materials or supplies, used
within a nonpublic school, within a microschool, or in the provision of alternative
instruction;
(4) The purchase of educationally related technological devices and associated
hardware and services, used within a nonpublic school, within a microschool, or in
the provision of alternative instruction;
(5) Transportation between the student's home and any school district, nonpublic
school, microschool, or institution of higher education, in which the student is
enrolled; and
(6) The fee for any standardized college or university entrance examination approved
by the department.
A scholarship awarded to or on behalf of an eligible student may not exceed the
lesser of eighty-two and five-tenths percent of the state's share of the per student
equivalent, as defined in § 13-13-10.1, or the actual expenses noted in the application.
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 13:
As a condition of awarding the scholarship to an eligible student, the scholarship
granting organization shall request documentation from the student's parent to verify any
expenditures and may seek the recovery, in whole or in part, of any scholarship amount
awarded, upon determination that the award was not used in accordance with the
purposes set forth in section 4 of this Act.
Section 6. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 13:
The Department of Education shall promulgate rules, in accordance with chapter
1-26, to:
(1) Establish the application and review process for the registration of a scholarship
granting organization;
(2) Establish the process by which the parent of an eligible student may annually apply
for a scholarship;
(3) Establish a process by which, and the time within which, a scholarship granting
organization must evaluate each application for a scholarship;
(4) Establish the time, manner, and method applicable to the distribution of
scholarship dollars;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1306B 4 1306
(5) Establish a process for verifying that the scholarship dollars were used in
compliance with section 4 of this Act;
(6) Establish an appeal process under which a parent may request and receive a review
of a denied reimbursement; and
(7) Establish a process by which any amounts not annually utilized, in accordance with
section 4 of this Act, may be recovered in whole or in part.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.